District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.02

Membership of Commission.

The Commission shall consist of 15 public (voting) members appointed by the Mayor. At least one-half of the membership of the Commission shall consist of actual consumers of services under this program, including low income and minority older persons, at least in proportion to the number of minority older persons in the District of Columbia. There shall also be the following ex officio members: the Directors of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of Recreation, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Employment Services, the Public Library, the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department (or the Director or Chief of such successor agencies), and a member of the Council of the District of Columbia.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 402, 22 DCR 2460
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(i), 46 DCR 1355

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2222.
1973 Ed., § 6-1722.

Prior Codifications

For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(i) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(i) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).

Emergency Legislation